static/hunspell/03.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX W70 Y 2 # V12 Opt2+
SFX W70 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W70 0 лөр .	+Indf

SFX W71 Y 2 # V01 FutPlan+
SFX W71 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W71 0 дыр .	+Indf

SFX W72 Y 2 # V02 FutPlan+
SFX W72 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W72 0 дер .	+Indf

SFX W73 Y 2 # V05 FutPlan+
SFX W73 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W73 0 ҙыр .	+Indf

SFX W74 Y 2 # V06 FutPlan+
SFX W74 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W74 0 ҙер .	+Indf

SFX W75 Y 2 # V09 FutPlan+
SFX W75 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W75 0 лыр .	+Indf

SFX W76 Y 2 # V10 FutPlan+
SFX W76 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W76 0 лер .	+Indf

SFX W77 Y 2 # V15 FutPlan+
SFX W77 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W77 0 тор .	+Indf

SFX W78 Y 3 # V09 GerPerf+
SFX W78 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W78 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W78 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W79 Y 3 # V10 GerPerf+
SFX W79 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W79 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W79 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W80 Y 3 # V13 GerPerf+
SFX W80 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W80 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX W80 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W81 Y 3 # V14 GerPerf+
SFX W81 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W81 0 тер .	+Indf
SFX W81 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W82 Y 3 # V15 GerPerf+
SFX W82 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W82 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX W82 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W83 Y 3 # V16 GerPerf+
SFX W83 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W83 0 төр .	+Indf
SFX W83 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W84 Y 3 # V09 Inf+
SFX W84 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W84 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W84 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W85 Y 3 # V10 Inf+
SFX W85 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W85 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W85 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX Z01 Y 1 # звукоподражательное слово Descr
SFX Z01 0 0 .	[Descr]

SFX Z02 Y 1 # звательное слово
SFX Z02 0 0 .	[Voc]

SFX Z03 Y 1 # вводное слово
SFX Z03 0 0 .	[Ger/Sim]

SFX Z04 Y 1 # модальное слово
SFX Z04 0 0 .	[Mod]

SFX Z05 Y 1 # в функции вспомагательного глагола
SFX Z06 0 0 .	[Verb]
